Utah statutes.
78B-6-1244.   One referee instead of three allowed by consent.

The court, with the consent of the parties, may appoint a single referee instead of three referees in the proceedings under the provisions of this part, and the single referee has all the powers, and may perform all the duties, required of the three referees.

